Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-3975
Director; surveys
of milksheds; make and publish results.

The director
shall make and publish the results of periodic surveys of milksheds to determine
the degree of compliance with the sanitary requirements for the production,
processing, handling, distribution, sampling, and hauling of milk and milk
products as provided in the Nebraska Milk Act. The director shall have the
power to adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations in accordance
with the procedure defined in the Administrative Procedure Act for the interpretation
and enforcement of this section. Such a survey or rating of a milkshed shall
follow the procedures prescribed by the United States Department of Health
and Human Services, United
States Food and Drug Administration, in its documents, as delineated in section 2-3965, entitled
Methods of Making Sanitation Ratings of Milk Shippers and Procedures Governing the Cooperative
State-Public Health Service/Food and Drug Administration Program of
the National Conference on Interstate Milk Shipments.

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 10;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 9;

Laws 1990, LB 856, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 201, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 198, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 2-3910;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB67, § 4.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.